New York, session 2025-2026, S10107.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 233-aa of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 16 to read as follows: 3 16. Every museum which has on display identifiable works of art and 4 artifacts, including such identifiable works of art and artifacts 5 created using metal materials used in the exchange for enslaved human 6 captives, known to have been created before nineteen hundred, that 7 changed hands due to theft, seizure, confiscation, forced sale or other 8 involuntary means in Africa or the United States during the transatlan- 9 tic slave period, through reconstruction (fifteen hundred -- eighteen 10 hundred seventy-seven) shall, to the extent practicable, prominently 11 place a placard or other signage acknowledging such information along 12 with such display. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11850-08-6